Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 9. Revenue Bonds

§ 41-7-901.
“Revenue” defined.

As used in this act [§§

41-7-901

through

41-7-935

] the word “revenue” means all or any part of any source or sources of payment excluding assessments upon or against the lands and property of the landowners and entrymen therein, but including the proceeds of or income from any existing or proposed contract or contracts.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.17.

§ 41-7-902.
Revenue bonds of irrigation and irrigation and power districts authorized.

Any irrigation district or combined irrigation and public power district created or organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming shall have the power and authority to issue its revenue bonds, the principal and interest of which shall be payable from designated revenues and sources of payment, including the proceeds of any existing or proposed construction work, contract or contracts, but excluding assessments upon and against the lands and property of the landowners and entrymen therein.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.18.

§ 41-7-903.
Designation of revenue from which principal or interest payable.

If in the judgment of the board of commissioners of any irrigation district or combined irrigation and public power district it is desirable that the principal or interest or both, of any of its bonds or any part of the principal or interest thereof be payable solely from revenue designated by the board of commissioners, it, with the approval of the court after a hearing thereon may so provide by resolution adopted at or prior to the time of the issuance of such bonds.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.19.

§ 41-7-904.
Statement on bonds of limitations on payment of principal.

If any or all of the principal or interest of any bonds be made payable only from revenue, the board of commissioners shall cause a brief statement of the limitations upon the payment of principal or portion thereof to be set forth in the bonds.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 4.; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.20.

§ 41-7-905.
Statement on bonds and coupons of limitations affecting interest payments.

If the limitations affect the payment of the interest of the bonds or any part thereof, a brief statement of the limitations shall be set forth in the interest coupons representing the interest and also in the bonds to which the interest coupons are appurtenant.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.21.

§ 41-7-906.
Statement on bonds and coupons of limitations affecting interest payments; portion of interest affected; separate coupons.

If the limitations affect the payment of only a portion of the interest which will accrue on any bond, the board of commissioners may provide either that:

The entire installment of interest payable on any interest payment date shall be represented by a single coupon which shall contain a brief statement as to the portion of interest subject to the limitations; or

The portion of interest not subject to the limitations and the portion of interest subject to the limitations shall be represented by separate interest coupons, the coupons representing the portion of the interest as to which limitations exist containing a brief statement of the limitations.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.22; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(i), added “or” at the end of the paragraph.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 41-7-907.
Designation of revenue releases district and officers from payment otherwise.

If any board of commissioners with the approval of the court provides that the principal or interest or both of any bonds or any portion of the principal or interest or both shall be payable solely from designated revenue, neither the district nor any officer thereof shall be held for payment otherwise.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.23.

§ 41-7-908.
Allocation of designated revenue; resolution.

Any designated revenue may by resolution of the board of commissioners be allocated to the payment of the whole or any portion of the principal or interest or both of any bonds.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.24.

§ 41-7-909.
Allocation of designated revenue; for bonds payable from revenue or assessments.

The allocation may be for either or both:

Payment of the whole or any part of the principal or interest or both of any bonds payable solely from revenue;

As additional security for the payment of the whole or any part of the principal or interest or both of any bonds payable from assessments.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.25.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-910.
Allocation of designated revenue; application.

Until the payment or retirement of the bonds for the benefit of which an allocation was made, the revenue allocated shall be applied solely to the payment of the obligation specified in the allocating resolution.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.26.

§ 41-7-911.
Allocation of designated revenue; bonds benefited by allocation.

An allocation may be made for the exclusive benefit of any one (1) or more issues or portions of issues of bonds of a district designated in the allocating resolutions or in the discretion of its board for the benefit of any bonds of the district at any time issued or outstanding.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.27.

§ 41-7-912.
Allocation of designated revenue; irrevocability.

Any allocation shall be irrevocable until all of the bonds for which the allocation was made and their appurtenant coupons have been paid or retired.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.28.

§ 41-7-913.
Allocation of revenue to reserve fund.

Any sources of revenue of any district may by order of its board of commissioners with the approval of the court be irrevocably allocated to a reserve fund established to pay the interest or principal of any bonds.

History.

Laws 1936, ch. 47, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.29.

§ 41-7-914.
Bonds may be made redeemable before maturity.

With the approval of the court a district may by resolution of its board of commissioners adopted at or prior to the time of issuing any bonds then proposed to be issued, provide for the call and redemption prior to their fixed maturity of any of the bonds.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.30.

§ 41-7-915.
Manner of redeeming.

Callable bonds may be redeemed in addition to other methods permitted in the following manner:

In numerical order or by lot as prescribed in the resolution;

On any interest payment date prior to their affixed maturity;

At not exceeding their par value and accrued interest or on the terms provided in the resolution.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.31.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-916.
Publication of notice of redemption.

Notice designating the bonds called for redemption shall be published once a week for three (3) successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the office county.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.32.

§ 41-7-917.
Publication of notice of redemption; time for publication.

The first publication of the redemption notice shall be not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days prior to the date fixed for redemption.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.33.

§ 41-7-918.
Interest ceases on redemption date.

If on the date fixed for redemption the district has provided funds available for the payment of the principal and interest of the bonds called, interest on them ceases.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.34.

§ 41-7-919.
When bonds may be sold.

A district may sell any bonds from time to time in such quantities as may be necessary and most advantageous to raise money for the purpose for which they were authorized.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.35.

§ 41-7-920.
Resolution as to sale.

Before any sale the board of commissioners shall by resolution entered on its minutes set forth all of the following:

Its intention to sell a specified amount of the bonds;

The day, hour, and place of sale.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.36.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-921.
Publication of notice of sale.

The board of commissioners shall give notice of the sale by posting on the county’s official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and by publication for at least two (2) weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county and in any other newspaper at its discretion.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.37; 2014 ch. 93, Laws 2014, ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “by posting on county's official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) by publication for at least two (2) weeks in the designated official newspaper of the county” for “by publication for at least three (3) weeks in some newspaper published in the office county.”

§ 41-7-922.
Contents of notice of sale.

The notice shall state that sealed proposals will be received by the board of commissioners at the district office for the purchase of bonds until the day and hour specified in the resolution.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 22; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.38.

§ 41-7-923.
Sale made to highest responsible bidder.

At the time specified the board of commissioners shall open the proposals and award the purchase of the bonds or any portion of them to the highest responsible bidder or bidders.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 23; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.39.

§ 41-7-924.
Certified check to accompany bid; forfeiture.

No proposal shall be accepted which is not accompanied by a certified check for a reasonable percentage of the amount of the bid as determined by the board of commissioners, but in no event less than two percent (2%), to apply on the purchase price of the bonds. The amount of the check shall be forfeited if after the acceptance of his proposal the bidder refuses to complete his purchase on the terms stated in his proposal.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.40.

§ 41-7-925.
Board may reject bids.

The board of commissioners may reject any or all bids.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.41.

§ 41-7-926.
Readvertisement or private sale.

In case no award is made, the board of commissioners thereafter may either readvertise the bonds or any part of them for sale or sell them at private sale.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.42.

§ 41-7-927.
Approval of private sale required.

No sale of bonds at private sale shall be valid unless approved by the court, or public service commission.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.43.

§ 41-7-928.
Exchange of construction bonds for property or stock.

A district may exchange its construction bonds for any property or interest in property which the district might acquire with the proceeds of the bonds, if sold, or for the capital stock of any corporation owning the property, upon terms the board of commissioners deem best.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.44.

§ 41-7-929.
Refunding bonds sold or exchanged for bonds or warrants.

Any refunding bonds may be either:

Sold from time to time in the same manner as other bonds of the district; or

Exchanged for other bonds or warrants of the district upon terms approved by the court.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 29; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.45; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-7-930.
Immediate cancellation of refunded or exchanged bonds.

Any outstanding bonds refunded or exchanged shall be immediately canceled by the treasurer.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 30; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.46.

§ 41-7-931.
Cancellation of unissued bonds; resolution of board.

Whenever the whole or any portion of any issue of bonds of any district remains unissued for more than one (1) year after the date of the election at which the bonds were authorized, the board of commissioners, by a resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the membership of the board of commissioners, may cancel all or any of those bonds and all coupons appurtenant to them.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 31; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.47.

§ 41-7-932.
Fixing time for consideration of resolution of cancellation.

Whenever a resolution to cancel bonds is offered, its consideration shall be postponed to a date fixed by the board of commissioners which is subsequent to final publication of the resolution.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 32; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.48.

§ 41-7-933.
Publication of cancellation resolution and notice of time for consideration.

The resolution together with a notice stating that the time fixed by the board of commissioners for the consideration of the resolution shall be published once a week for at least two (2) successive weeks in a newspaper published in the office county.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 33; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.49.

§ 41-7-934.
No bonds issued after cancellation resolution adopted.

After the adoption of a resolution to cancel bonds no other bonds shall be issued in pursuance of the proceedings taken in relation to the issuance of the bonds so canceled.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 34; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.50.

§ 41-7-935.
Destruction of canceled bonds and coupons.

Any bonds and coupons so canceled shall be destroyed under the direction of the board of commissioners.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 47, § 35; W.S. 1957, § 41-348.51.